District of Columbia statutes.
47-1315

Liens for taxes or assessments — Confirmation of sale; amount payable; disposition of surplus; delivery of deed.

Every such sale shall be reported to and confirmed by said equity Court, and no sale shall be made for an amount less than such aggregate taxes, interest, and costs incurred in the institution of suit, including advertising and sale, unless by express order of the Court. Any surplus remaining from sales made under §§ 47-1312 to 47-1315 shall be paid by the Collector of Taxes into the registry of the Court, to abide its further order for payment to the person or persons entitled thereto; and any such moneys remaining unclaimed for a period of 5 years after confirmation of any such sale shall be paid into the Treasury of the United States and credited to the revenues of the District of Columbia. Upon confirmation of such sale by order of Court and payment of the purchase price, and upon full compliance with all of the terms of sale, the Clerk of the Court shall execute and deliver to the purchaser a deed to the property so sold, which deed shall convey to said purchaser all of the right, title, and estate of all persons whether named in such suit or not.

Mar. 2, 1936, 49 Stat. 1155, ch. 111, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.
1973 Ed., § 47-1014.
1981 Ed., § 47-1315.
This section is referenced in § 47-1303.04.